North Dakota, session 69, SB2329.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. A new section to chapter 11-10 of the North Dakota Century Code is created and
enacted as follows:
When a county may maintain or vacate streets in a dissolved city.
If a dissolved city is located in an unorganized township, the county may choose to maintain or
vacate, under chapter 40 - 39, the streets and alleys in the dissolved city .
SECTION 2. AMENDMENT. Section 40-53.1-07 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended and
reenacted as follows:
40-53.1-07. Dissolution - Care of property - Manager - Disposition of funds.
If a city is dissolved, the board of county commissioners shall assume control of all property
belonging to the dissolved city and, except for streets and alleys if an organized township chooses to
maintain or vacate streets or alleys in the dissolved city under section 3 of this Act. The county shall
employ a qualified person to manage and operate the property and to collect all charges due from the
operation of such property or dispose of the property in accordance with chapter 11-27. The person
employed shall execute a bond to the county in an amount determined by the board of county
commissioners, conditioned that that person will faithfully perform that person's duties and will promptly
pay all money that person receives to the county treasurer monthly on the first day of each month. The
bond shall be executed by the person employed and a surety company authorized to do business in the
state. The premium on the bond shall be paid by the board of county commissioners from city funds, if
any, and if none, from county funds.
SECTION 3. A new section to chapter 58-03 of the North Dakota Century Code is created and
enacted as follows:
When a township may maintain or vacate streets in a dissolved city.
If a dissolved city is located in an organized township, the township may choose to maintain or
vacate, under chapter 40 - 39, the streets and alleys in the dissolved city .

S. B. NO. 2329 - PAGE 2
____________________________ ____________________________
President of the Senate Speaker of the House
____________________________ ____________________________
Secretary of the Senate Chief Clerk of the House
This certifies that the within bill originated in the Senate of the Sixty-ninth Legislative Assembly of North
Dakota and is known on the records of that body as Senate Bill No. 2329.
Senate Vote: Yeas 44 Nays 0 Absent 3
House Vote: Yeas 91 Nays 1 Absent 2
____________________________
Secretary of the Senate
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State